Colorado, session 2026A, HB1072.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 18-12-100.5 as
follows:
18-12-100.5. Constitutional right to own, possess, and use a
firearm.
AN INDIVIDUAL HAS A RIGHT TO OWN, POSSESS, AND USE A FIREARM
TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMISSIBLE BY THE STATE AND FEDERAL
CONSTITUTIONS.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal article 14.5
of title 13.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 16-3-301.5.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-3-101, repeal (13)
as follows:
13-3-101. State court administrator - duties - report -
definitions - repeal.
(13) The state court administrator or the administrator's designee
shall present at the judicial department's hearing pursuant to section
2-7-203 statistics related to extreme risk protection orders in article 14.5
of this title 13. The statistics must include the number of petitions filed
for temporary extreme risk protection orders, the number of petitions filed
for extreme risk protection orders, the number of temporary extreme risk
protection orders issued and denied, the number of extreme risk
protection orders issued and denied, the number of temporary extreme
risk protection orders terminated, the number of extreme risk protection
orders terminated, and the number of extreme risk protection orders
-2- HB26-1072

renewed. The state court administrator or the administrator's designee
shall also report state court data related to all persons who are subject to
any temporary emergency risk protection order or emergency risk
protection order and who, within thirty days after the issuance or
execution of the protection order, are charged with a criminal offense.
The report must include the nature of the criminal offense, including but
not limited to any offense for violation of the emergency risk protection
order and the disposition or status of that criminal offense.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-40-104, amend
(4)(a)(II) as follows:
13-40-104. Unlawful detention defined - definitions - repeal.
(4) (a) It is not an unlawful detention of real property as described
in subsection (1)(d), (1)(d.5), (1)(e), (1)(e.5), or (1)(j) of this section if the
tenant or lessee is a victim-survivor of unlawful sexual behavior, stalking,
domestic violence, or domestic abuse, which unlawful sexual behavior,
stalking, domestic violence, or domestic abuse was the cause of,
contributed to, or resulted in the alleged unlawful detention and which
unlawful sexual behavior, stalking, domestic violence, or domestic abuse
has been documented by at least one of the following:
(II) A valid civil, criminal, or emergency protection order or
restraining order issued pursuant to article 14 or article 14.5 of this title
13 or section 18-1-1001;
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-116, amend
(5)(a)(IV) as follows:
18-12-116. Enforcement of large-capacity magazine ban by
regulating the manufacture, distribution, transfer, sale, and purchase
of specified semiautomatic firearms - penalties - definitions.
-3- HB26-1072

(5) (a) (IV) A basic or extended firearms safety course must
satisfy the course requirements adopted by the division and include, but
is not limited to including, instruction on safe handling of semiautomatic
firearms and ammunition magazines, safe storage of firearms and child
safety, firearm deaths associated with mental illness, extreme risk
protection orders described in article 14.5 of title 13, and victim
awareness and empathy.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-202.5, amend
(3)(d) as follows:
18-12-202.5. Concealed handgun training class - refresher
class - rules.
(3) A concealed handgun training class must include the following
elements:
(d) Instruction regarding federal and state laws pertaining to the
lawful purchase, ownership, transportation, use, and possession of
firearms, including instruction on extreme risk protection orders
described in article 14.5 of title 13, requirements for reporting lost or
stolen firearms described in section 18-12-113, secure firearms storage
requirements described in section 18-12-114, and any other state law
enacted within five years before the class that pertains to the purchase,
ownership, transportation, use, and possession of firearms;
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-203, amend
(1) introductory portion and (1)(g) as follows:
18-12-203. Criteria for obtaining a permit.
(1) Beginning May 17, 2003, Except as set forth in this section,
a sheriff shall issue a permit to carry a concealed handgun to an applicant
who:
-4- HB26-1072

(g) Is not subject to:
(I) A protection order issued pursuant to section 18-1-1001 or
section 19-2.5-607 that is in effect at the time the application is
submitted; or
(II) A permanent protection order issued pursuant to article 14 of
title 13; OR
(III) A temporary protection order issued pursuant to article 14 of
title 13 that is in effect at the time the application is submitted; or
(IV) A temporary extreme risk protection order issued pursuant
to section 13-14.5-103 (3) or an extreme risk protection order issued
pursuant to section 13-14.5-105 (2);
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 24-33.5-119.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-539, repeal
(3)(d) as follows:
24-33.5-539. Automated protection order notification system
- definitions.
(3) The automated protection order notification system must
include, but is not limited to, the following information, if available:
(d) Whether an extreme risk protection order was issued against
the restrained person pursuant to article 14.5 of title 13, and if so, the date
the extreme risk protection order was served or was attempted to be
served;
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-20.5-1203,
repeal (1)(a) as follows:
25-20.5-1203. Gun violence prevention awareness and
education - violence intervention grant program - rules.
(1) The office shall increase the awareness of, and educate the
-5- HB26-1072

general public about, state and federal laws and existing resources
relating to gun violence prevention, including the following:
(a) The availability of, and the process for requesting, an extreme
risk protection order pursuant to article 14.5 of title 13;
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-20.5-1205,
amend (3) as follows:
25-20.5-1205. Federal grants - other funds - gifts, grants, and
donations.
(3) The office shall expend funds annually on a public education
campaign regarding the availability of, and the process for requesting, an
extreme risk protection order pursuant to article 14.5 of title 13 and as
described in section 25-20.5-1203 (2)(a).
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 38-12-402, amend
(2)(a.5)(I)(D) as follows:
38-12-402. Protection for victim-survivors of unlawful sexual
behavior, stalking, domestic violence, or domestic abuse.
(2) (a.5) (I) For the purposes of subsection (2)(a) of this section,
to provide evidence that the tenant is a victim-survivor of unlawful sexual
behavior, stalking, domestic violence, or domestic abuse, a tenant may
provide to the landlord at least one of the following:
(D) A valid civil, criminal, or emergency protection order or
restraining order issued pursuant to article 14 or article 14.5 of title 13 or
section 18-1-1001.
SECTION 14. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
-6- HB26-1072

referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-7- HB26-1072